Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5968.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 21. (1) The Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2), the secretary of state shall be is the chief election officer of the this state and shall have has supervisory control over local election officials in the performance of their duties under the provisions of this act. (2) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (3), if the incumbent secretary of state files a nominating petition or filing fee for, or is nominated to, any other elected public office, all of the following apply: (a) The deputy secretary of state becomes the chief election officer of this state, and has supervisory control over local election officials in the performance of their duties, for the election at which the incumbent secretary of state is a candidate for any other elected public office. (b) The incumbent secretary of state is prohibited from supervising or administering the election at which the incumbent secretary of state is a candidate for any other elected public office. (c) The secretary of state retains all other powers and duties not related to supervising or administering elections. (3) Subsection (2) does not apply to the incumbent secretary of state in conducting election audits, and supervising and directing county election officials in conducting election audits, as provided under this act and section 4(1)(l) of article II of the state constitution of 1963. Sec. 31. (1) The Except as otherwise provided under section 21, the secretary of state shall do all of the following: (a) Subject to subsection (2), issue instructions and promulgate rules pursuant to under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, for the conduct of elections and registrations in accordance with the laws of this state. (b) Advise and direct local election officials as to the proper methods of conducting elections. (c) Publish and furnish for the use in each election precinct before each state primary and election a manual of instructions that includes specific instructions on assisting voters in casting their ballots, directions on the location of voting stations in polling places, procedures and forms for processing challenges, and procedures on prohibiting campaigning in the polling places as prescribed in this act. (d) Publish indexed pamphlet copies of the registration, primary, and election laws and furnish to the various county, city, township, and village clerks a sufficient number of copies for their the clerk's own use and to enable them the clerks to include 1 copy with the election supplies furnished each precinct board of election inspectors under their respective jurisdictions. The secretary of state may furnish single copies of the publications to organizations or individuals who request the same for purposes of instruction or public reference. (e) Prescribe and require uniform forms, notices, and supplies the secretary of state considers advisable for use in the conduct of elections and registrations. (f) Prepare the form of ballot for any proposed amendment to the state constitution of 1963 or proposal under the initiative or referendum provision of the state constitution of 1963 to be submitted to the voters of this state. (g) Require reports from the local election officials the secretary of state considers necessary. (h) Investigate, or cause to be investigated by local authorities, the administration of election laws, and report violations of the election laws and regulations to the attorney general or prosecuting attorney, or both, for prosecution. (i) Publish in the legislative manual the vote for governor and secretary of state by townships and wards and the vote for members of the state legislature cast at the preceding November election, which shall that must be returned to the secretary of state by the county clerks on or before the first day of December following the election. All clerks shall furnish to the secretary of state, promptly and without compensation, any further information requested of them the clerks to be used in the compilation of the legislative manual. (j) Establish a curriculum for comprehensive training and accreditation of all county, city, township, and village officials who are responsible for conducting elections. (k) Establish a continuing election education program for all county, city, township, and village clerks. (l) Establish and require attendance by all new appointed or elected election officials at an initial course of instruction within 6 months before the date of the election. (m) Establish a comprehensive training curriculum for all precinct election inspectors. (n) Create an election day dispute resolution team that has regional representatives of the department of state, which team shall appear on site, if necessary. (2) Pursuant to Except as otherwise provided under section 21, under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, the secretary of state shall promulgate rules establishing uniform standards for state and local nominating, recall, and ballot question petition signatures. The standards for petition signatures may include, but need not be limited to, standards for all of the following: (a) Determining the validity of registration of a circulator or individual signing a petition. (b) Determining the genuineness of the signature of a circulator or individual signing a petition, including digitized signatures. (c) Proper designation of the place of registration of a circulator or individual signing a petition. Sec. 32. (1) In the office of the secretary of state, the bureau of elections created by former 1951 PA 65 continues under the supervision of a director of elections, to be appointed by the secretary of state under civil service regulations. The Except as otherwise provided under section 21, the director of elections shall be is vested with the powers and shall perform the duties of the secretary of state under his or her the secretary of state's supervision, with respect to the supervision and administration of the election laws. The director of elections shall be is a nonmember secretary of the state board of state canvassers. (2) The director of elections, with the approval of the state board of state canvassers, shall prepare a statement for designation on the ballot in not more than 100 words, exclusive of caption, of the purpose of any proposed amendment or question to be submitted to the electors as required under section 9 of article II, section 34 of article IV if the legislature does not provide for the content of the question to be submitted to the electors, or section 1 or 2 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963. The statement shall must consist of a true and impartial statement of the purpose of the amendment or question in such language as shall create no prejudice for or against the proposed amendment or question. The powers and duties of the state board of state canvassers and the secretary of state with respect to the preparation of the statement are transferred to the director of elections. The Except as otherwise provided under section 21, the secretary of state shall certify the statement of the purpose of any proposed amendment or question to be submitted to the electors not later than 60 days before the date of the election.